Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF5000.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Laws 2023, chapter 72, article 2, section 9, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Forest Lake; Veterans Memorial 250,000 For a grant to the new text begin city of new text end Forest Lake deleted text begin Veterans Memorial Committeedeleted text end to construct a memorial to veterans of the United States armed forces at Lakeside Memorial Park. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end